tables/de-g2-core.ctb
# ZU (4.3.2 Einformige Kürzungen, alleinstehend oder in Wortverbindungen)
word zu 1356
always zu-\s 2-1356-36-0
always zu 2-1356
prfword zuber 1356-136-12-12456
sufword zuberbühler 1356-136-12-12456-12-1256-125-123-12456
prfword zubers 1356-136-12-12456-234
always azubi 1-1356-136-12-24
always zucc 1356-136-6-14-6-14
always zucch 1356-136-6-14-1456
always zucht 1356-136-1456-2345
always zuck 1356-136-46
begmidword venezuel 1236-14-15-1356-136-13456
always salzuflen 234-25-1356-136-124-123-14
prfword zug 1356-136-1245
begmidword zugb 1356-136-1245-12
always zugrabauk 1356-136-1245-1235-1-12-16-13
begmidword zugreinig 1356-136-1245-1235-1246-45
begmidword herumzu 125-12456-136-134-2-1356
begmidword herumzupf 125-12456-136-134-1356-136-1234-124
always anzugärmel 235-1356-136-1245-345-1235-134-13456
always eilzug 146-123-1356-136-1245
always sattelzug 234-1-2345-2345-13456-1356-136-1245
always bevorzug 23-2-26-1356-136-1245
prfword bevorzuge 23-2-26-1356-136-12346
before s begmidword zugs 1356-136-1245-234
begmidword zugaukel 2-1356-1245-16-13-13456
begmidword zugeb 2-1356-12346-12
begmidword zugebet 2-1356-12346-23-2345
# HOMONYM
begmidword zugreif 2-1356-1245-1235-146-124
prfword zugst 1356-136-1245-23456
always zugabteil 1356-136-1245-1-12-2345-146-123
always zugabfahr 1356-136-1245-1-12-2-1235
always zuganschluss 1356-136-1245-235-156-123-136-2346
always zuganschlüss 1356-136-1245-235-156-123-1256-2346
begmidword zugbalk 1356-136-1245-12-25-13
always zugband 1356-136-1245-12-235-145
begmidword zugbänd 1356-136-1245-12-345-1345-145
begmidword zugbr 1356-136-1245-12-1235
always zugbügel 1356-136-1245-12-1256-1245-13456
begmidword zugbe 1356-136-1245-23
before d begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
prfword zuge 1356-136-12346
begmidword zuge 2-1356-12346
always zugebunden 2-1356-12346-12-256-145-14
always zugegen 2-1356-2-1245
begmidword zugeh 2-1356-1245-2356
begmidword zugehab 2-1356-12346-2-125
begmidword zugehak 2-1356-12346-125-1-13
always zugehalten 2-1356-12346-125-25-2345-14
begmidword zugehämmer 2-1356-12346-125-345-1346-12456
begmidword zugehäng 2-1356-12346-125-345-1345-1245
begmidword zugehef 2-1356-12346-125-15-124
begmidword zugeheil 2-1356-12346-125-146-123
begmidword zugehopp 2-1356-12346-125-135-1234-1234
always zugehör 2-1356-12346-125-246-1235
begmidword zugehump 2-1356-12346-125-136-134-1234
begmidword zugent 1356-136-1245-14-2345
always lastzug 123-1-23456-1356-136-1245
begmidword zugemal 2-1356-12346-134-25
prfword zugehe 2-1356-1245-2356-15
prfword zugehen 2-1356-1245-2356-14
always zugehend 2-1356-1245-2356-14-145
prfword zugeher 2-1356-1245-2356-12456
always zugehfrau 2-1356-1245-2356-124-1235-16
prfword zugehst 2-1356-1245-2356-23456
prfword zugeht 2-1356-1245-2356-2345
prfword zugeinricht 1356-136-1245-1246-2-3456
prfword zuger 1356-136-1245-12456
sufword zugerin 1356-136-1245-12456-35
always zugerland 1356-136-1245-12456-123-235-145
begmidword zugerländ 1356-136-1245-12456-123-345-1345-145
always zugersee 1356-136-1245-12456-234-15-15
prfword zuges 1356-136-1245-123456
before f begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
before g begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
before h begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
before j begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
always zugig 1356-136-1245-45
before k begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
always zugkräft 1356-136-1245-5-13-124
always zuglang 1356-136-1245-123-1245
always zugläng 1356-136-1245-5-123-1245
always zuglast 1356-136-1245-123-1-23456
always zuglein 1356-136-1245-123-1246
always zugloch 1356-136-1245-123-135-1456
always zuglöch 1356-136-1245-123-246-1456
always zugluft 1356-136-1245-123-136-124-2345
before m begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
before n begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
always zugober 1356-136-1245-135-12-12456
always zugochs 1356-136-1245-135-1456-234
always zugraub 1356-136-1245-1235-16-12
always zugräub 1356-136-1245-1235-34-12
always zugrecht 1356-136-1245-1235-2345
always zugreis 1356-136-1245-1235-146-234
begmidword zugrestaur 1356-136-1245-1235-15-23456-16-1235
always zugroll 1356-136-1245-1235-135-12345
before s begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
before s begmidword zugs 1356-136-1245-234
before t begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
always bezug 23-1356-136-1245
always zugüber 1356-136-1245-2-1256
always zugunglück 1356-136-1245-256-1245-46
before kpvw begmidword zug 1356-136-1245
before z begmidword zug 1356-136-1245

after z midendword uhr 136-125-1235
always zuhr 1356-136-125-1235
always zuider 1356-136-24-145-12456
always suzuki 234-136-1356-136-13-24
always lapislazuli 123-1-1234-24-234-123-1-1356-136-123-24
always zull 1356-136-12345
always zulp 1356-136-123-1234
always zulu 1356-136-123-136
begmidword abzuluchs 1-12-2-1356-123-136-1456-234
begmidword abzulutsch 1-12-2-1356-123-136-2345-156
always zuluft 2-1356-123-136-124-2345
always zulugen 2-1356-123-136-1245-14
begmidword pelzum 1234-13456-1356-136-134
midendword zunabhängig 1356-256-1-12-125-345-1345-1245-45
always zunder 1356-256-145-12456
begmidword schmerzun 156-134-12456-1356-256
always zunft 1356-256-124-2345
# siehe -ung           zunge
# siehe -ung           zungen
always münzunion 134-1256-1345-1356-256-24-135-1345
always zupf 1356-136-1234-124
begmidword zupfeif 2-1356-1234-124-146-124
begmidword zupferch 2-1356-1234-124-12456-1456
begmidword zupflanz 2-1356-1234-124-123-235-1356
begmidword zupflüg 2-1356-1234-124-123-1256-1245
prfword zupflüge 2-1356-1234-124-123-1256-12346
begmidword zupfropf 2-1356-1234-124-1235-135-1234-124
begmidword putzutensi 1234-136-2345-1356-136-2345-14-234-24
always zutsch 1356-136-2345-156
always zuzel 1356-136-1356-13456
always frequenz 124-1235-15-6-12345-136-14-1356

# ZUM (4.4 Zweiformige Kürzungen)
word zum 1356-134
always zumal 2-1356-134
word kurzum 13-1356-136-134
begmidword lizenzum 123-24-1356-14-1356-136-134
begmidword blitzum 12-123-24-2345-1356-136-134
begmidword schutzum 156-136-2345-1356-136-134

# ZUNÄCHST (4.4 Zweiformige Kürzungen)
always zunächst 1356-1345

# ZUR (4.4 Zweiformige Kürzungen)
word zur 1356-1235
always zurecht 2-1356-1235-2345
always zurr 1356-136-1235-1235
begmidword zurred 1356-1235-1235-15-145
begmidword zurruh 1356-1235-1235-136-125
begmidword zurruhesetz 1356-1235-1235-136-125-15-2-15
begmidword zurschau 1356-1235-156-16
begmidword zurver 1356-1235-1236-12456
word zurzeit 1356-1235-1356-2345
sufword azur 1-1356-136-1235
begmidword mazurk 134-1-1356-136-1235-13
begmidword karenzur 13-356-14-1356-136-1235
begmidword lizenzur 123-24-1356-14-1356-136-1235
begmidword kurzur 13-1356-136-1235
begmidword sturzursach 23456-136-1235-1356-136-1235-234-56

# ZURÜCK (4.4 Zweiformige Kürzungen)
always zurück 1356-46
prfword zurücken 2-1356-1235-46-14
begmidword zurücken 2-1356-1235-46-14
begmidword zurückent 1356-46-14-2345

# ZUSAMMEN (4.4 Zweiformige Kürzungen)
always zusammen 1356-234

# ZWISCHEN (4.4 Zweiformige Kürzungen)
always zwischen 1356-2456
